Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 3 SECURITY FOR COMPENSATION
§ 72-332. Payment for second injuries from industrial special indemnity account.

If an employee who has a permanent physical impairment from any cause or origin, incurs a subsequent disability by an injury or occupational disease arising out of and in the course of his employment, and by reason of the combined effects of both the pre-existing impairment and the subsequent injury or occupational disease or by reason of the aggravation and acceleration of the pre-existing impairment suffers total and permanent disability, the employer and surety shall be liable for payment of compensation benefits only for the disability caused by the injury or occupational disease, including scheduled and unscheduled permanent disabilities, and the injured employee shall be compensated for the remainder of his income benefits out of the industrial special indemnity account [fund].

“Permanent physical impairment” is as defined in section 72-422, Idaho Code, provided, however, as used in this section such impairment must be a permanent condition, whether congenital or due to injury or disease, of such seriousness as to constitute a hindrance or obstacle to obtaining employment or to obtaining re-employment if the claimant should become employed. This shall be interpreted subjectively as to the particular employee involved, however, the mere fact that a claimant is employed at the time of the subsequent injury shall not create a presumption that the pre-existing permanent physical impairment was not of such seriousness as to constitute such hindrance or obstacle to obtaining employment.

Parties to Proceed.

In proceeding involving the second injury fund the state treasurer was not a necessary party since he merely made disbursements from the funds, and therefore it was not necessary to give notice to the state treasurer of injury upon which claim against the fund was based. Anderson v. Potlatch Forests, Inc., 77 Idaho 263, 291 P.2d 859 (1955).

§ 72-333. Perpetual appropriation.

All moneys which may come into the industrial special indemnity fund are hereby perpetually appropriated to the department of administration to be expended by it for the purposes stated in sections 72-331 and 72-332, Idaho Code.

§ 72-334. Filing notice of claim with the industrial special indemnity fund — Time for filing — Records to be included with notice of claim — Jurisdictional effect.

Any claimant, employer or surety making a claim for benefits with the industrial special indemnity fund shall file a notice of claim with the manager not less than sixty (60) days prior to the date of filing of a complaint against the industrial special indemnity fund with the industrial commission seeking benefits from the industrial special indemnity fund. Such notice of claim shall include, but not be limited to, a detailed statement describing the disability claim and supporting documentation including relevant medical and vocational rehabilitation records. Failure to timely file a notice of claim with the manager shall require the involuntary dismissal of any complaint against the industrial special indemnity fund regarding the claim for benefits which the party seeking to join the industrial special indemnity fund may cause to be filed with the industrial commission. The manager shall evaluate the notice of claim and shall approve or deny the claim or make an offer of settlement within the sixty (60) day period. If, in the discretion of the manager, the notice of claim is determined to be incomplete, the manager may, upon written notice to the party seeking to join the industrial special indemnity fund, extend the time period for evaluation of the claim for a maximum of thirty (30) days in order to request the necessary documents and records. The manager shall approve or deny the claim or make an offer of settlement within the extended period.